Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.831

Coverage for hearing instruments.

A health plan offered to public employees and their covered dependents under this chapter issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2024, is subject to RCW 48.43.135.

[ 2023 c 245 s 3.]